District of Columbia statutes.
31-5031.05

Minimum capital and surplus requirements.

Before being licensed to do an insurance business in the District, a title insurer shall establish and maintain a minimum paid-in capital of not less than $500,000 and paid-in initial surplus of at least $500,000, for a total minimum capital and surplus total of at least $1 million.

Sept. 24, 2010, D.C. Law 18-223, § 2146, 57 DCR 6242
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2146 of Fiscal Year 2011 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-463, July 2, 2010, 57 DCR 6542).